Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.527

Security interest.

"Security interest" has the same meaning as in RCW 62A.1-201.

[ 2010 c 161 s 141.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.